California, session 20252026, SB1263.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7058.9 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7058.9. (a) Notwithstanding Section 40520 of the Public Resources Code, a contractor shall not engage in debris removal, including muck out and ash out, on residential property that is damaged or destroyed by a natural disaster for which a state of emergency is declared by the Governor, pursuant to Section 8625 of Government Code, or for which an emergency or major disaster is declared by the President of the United States, unless the contractor has one of the following licenses or classifications:(1) A - General Engineering Contractor.(2) B - General Building Contractor.(3) C-12 - Earthwork and Paving and Paving.(4) C-21 - Building Moving/Demolition.(5) (A) C-49 - Tree and Palm.(B) Debris removal pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to tree service and removal only.(b) During a declared federal or state emergency or for a declared disaster area due to a natural disaster, any Any licensee authorized to perform debris removal pursuant to this section shall have passed an approved hazardous substance certification examination pursuant to Section 7058.7 and shall comply with the hazardous waste operations and emergency response requirements pursuant to Section 5192 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.(c) The This section shall apply when a permit is required for debris removal resulting from a natural disaster, as described in subdivision (a), and the restrictions for debris removal, including muck out and ash out, pursuant to this section shall no longer apply after any needed debris removal, including muck out or ash out, is deemed completed or finalized within the requirements of by the local permitting agency, irrespective of whether an emergency proclamation or disaster declaration is still in effect.(d) For the purposes of this section, “debris” the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Debris” means debris from, or located on, a residential property as a result of a natural disaster. “Debris” does not include any materials unrelated to the declared emergency or disaster.(2) “Debris removal” means appropriate identification, encapsulation, transportation, and disposal of debris.